Hawaii statutes.
§128E-9 Filing fees. Facilities that
are required to report according to section 128E-6(a)(2), shall remit $100 with
each submission of chemical inventory forms or Tier II forms to the commission
by March 1 of each year. All moneys collected by the department pursuant
to this section shall be deposited in the state treasury and accrue to the
credit of the environmental response revolving fund established in section
128D-2. [L 1993, c 300, pt of §1; am L 1997, c 260, §5]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next